Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-342
Aborted child; sell, transfer, distribute, give away; violation; penalty.

The knowing, willful, or intentional sale, transfer, distribution, or giving away of any live or viable aborted child for any form of experimentation is a Class III felony. The knowing, willful, or intentional consenting to, aiding, or abetting of any such sale, transfer, distribution, or other unlawful disposition of an aborted child is a Class III felony. This section shall not prohibit or regulate diagnostic or remedial procedures the purpose of which is to preserve the life or health of the aborted child or the mother.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 57;

Laws 1979, LB 316, § 8.